Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.96, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Violation as deceptive practice. new text end new text begin A violation of any of the provisions of this section is considered an unfair or deceptive trade practice under section 8.31, subdivision 1, and is enforceable by the attorney general. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.96, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06645 62J.96 ACCESS TO 340B DRUGS. Subd. 3. Expiration. This section expires July 1, 2027.